Missouri, session 2026, HB2693.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 68.010, 68.015, 68.025, 68.040, 68.045, 68.055, 68.057, 68.060,
68.075, 68.205, and 68.259, RSMo, are repealed and twelve new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 68.010, 68.015, 68.025, 68.040, 68.045, 68.055, 68.057,
68.060, 68.075, 68.085, 68.205, and 68.253, to read as follows:
68.010. 1. Every city or county which is situated upon, or adjacent to, or which
embraces within its boundaries a navigable waterway, is hereby authorized to form a local
port authority, and upon approval of the highways and transportation commission of the state
of Missouri, the port authority shall be a political subdivision of this state. In every
constitutional charter city not within a county, a local "Port Authority" is created by sections
68.010, 68.015, 68.025, 68.040, 68.045, 68.060 and 68.070 and shall become a political
subdivision of this state September 28, 1975.
2. The highways and transportation commission of the state of Missouri is hereby
authorized to accept applications, conduct hearings, and approve or disapprove applications
for approval of local or regional port authorities as political subdivisions of this state, as
provided herein, but in determining the approval or disapproval of such applications, the
highways and transportation commission shall consider the following criteria:
(1) The population of any city and/or county submitting the application;
(2) The desirability and economic feasibility of having more than a single port
authority within the same geographic area;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2693 2
(3) The technical and economic capability of participating cities and/or counties, as
well as private interests, to plan and carry out port development within the proposed district;
(4) The amount of actual and potential river traffic that would make use of any
facilities developed by a port authority;
(5) The potential economic impact on the immediate area from which the application
originates; and
(6) The potential impact on the economic development of the entire state and how the
proposed port authority's developmental activities relate to any state plans.

Provided, however, any such application shall be granted if it is made by a city or county of at
least three hundred thousand population, having a common boundary with the state of
Kansas, or by a group of cities or counties at least one of which meets the aforesaid criteria,
and if no proposed boundary of the port authority described in such application overlaps the
boundary of any then existing port authority.
3. No city shall create a port authority under sections 68.010, 68.015, 68.025, 68.040,
68.045, 68.060 and 68.070 if said city is located within a county that has created a port
authority which has received approval as a political subdivision of this state under sections
68.010, 68.015, 68.025, 68.040, 68.045, 68.060 and 68.070; provided, however, this
subsection shall not be construed as invalidating any port authority created by a city
and approved as a political subdivision prior to the creation of a port authority by a
county.
68.015. 1. (1) The legislative body, or county commission, of each county or city
creating a port authority or any port authority created within said city pursuant to section
68.010 hereof shall designate what areas within such county or city shall comprise one or
more port districts, subject to the limitation that any area designated as within a port district
shall be or could be reasonably connected to the business of a port. The boundaries of any
port district shall be filed with the clerk of the county commission, city clerk, or clerk of the
legislative or governing body of the county as applicable and shall become effective upon
approval of the transportation commission. The legislative body or county commission may
from time to time enlarge or reduce the area comprising any port district. Any change of
boundaries shall be submitted for approval to the highways and transportation commission
and upon approval shall be filed with the appropriate clerk and thereupon become effective.
(2) If a port authority whose port district includes a constitutional charter city
located in four or more counties shall purchase or lease real property situated anywhere
within such counties, such real property shall be deemed included within the port
district and the port authority shall be empowered to exercise its powers under section
68.025 with respect to such real property, and any personal property located thereon.

HCS HB 2693 3
2. The legislative body or county commission of any county or city authorized to
create a local port authority may appropriate, allocate and expend such funds of the county or
city for the planning and development of a port district as are reasonable and necessary to
carry out the provisions of this chapter.
68.025. 1. Every local and regional port authority, approved as a political subdivision
of the state, shall have the following powers to:
(1) Confer with any similar body created under laws of this or any other state for the
purpose of adopting a comprehensive plan for the future development and improvement of its
port districts;
(2) Consider and adopt detailed and comprehensive plans for future development and
improvement of its port districts and to coordinate such plans with regional and state
programs;
(3) Establish a port improvement district in accordance with this chapter;
(4) Carry out any of the projects enumerated in subdivision (17) of section 68.205;
(5) Within the boundaries of any established port improvement district, to levy either
a sales and use tax or a real property tax, or both, for the purposes of paying any part of the
cost of a project benefitting property in a port improvement district; except that no port
improvement district real property tax may be levied on any property, real or personal, which
is assessed pursuant to sections 151.010 to 151.340, unless such real property tax levy is
agreed to in writing by the property's owner;
(6) Pledge both revenues generated by any port improvement district and any other
port authority revenue source to the repayment of any outstanding obligations;
(7) Either jointly with a similar body, or separately, recommend to the proper
departments of the government of the United States, or any state or subdivision thereof, or to
any other body, the carrying out of any public improvement for the benefit of its port districts;
(8) Provide for membership in any official, industrial, commercial, or trade
association, or any other organization concerned with such purposes, for receptions of
officials or others as may contribute to the advancement of its port districts and any industrial
development therein, and for such other public relations activities as will promote the same,
and such activities shall be considered a public purpose;
(9) Represent its port districts before all federal, state and local agencies;
(10) Cooperate with other public or private agencies [and with], individuals,
partnerships, corporations, industry, business, and labor in port district improvement
matters;
(11) Enter into any agreement with any other states, agencies, authorities,
commissions, municipalities, persons, corporations, or the United States, to effect any of
the provisions contained in this chapter;

HCS HB 2693 4
(12) Approve the construction of all wharves, piers, bulkheads, jetties, or other
structures;
(13) Prevent or remove, or cause to be removed, obstructions in harbor areas,
including the removal of wrecks, wharves, piers, bulkheads, derelicts, jetties or other
structures endangering the health and general welfare of the port districts; in case of the
sinking of a facility from any cause, such facility or vessel shall be removed from the harbor
at the expense of its owner or agent so that it shall not obstruct the harbor;
(14) Recommend the relocation, change, or removal of dock lines and shore or harbor
lines;
(15) Acquire, own, construct, redevelop, lease, maintain, and conduct land
reclamation and resource recovery, including the removal of sand, rock, or gravel,
residential developments, commercial developments, mixed-use developments, recreational
facilities, industrial parks, industrial facilities, and terminals, terminal facilities, warehouses
and any other type port facility;
(16) Acquire, own, lease, sell, mortgage, encumber, or otherwise dispose of interest
in and to real property and improvements situate thereon and in personal property necessary
to fulfill the purposes of the port authority;
(17) Acquire rights-of-way and property of any kind or nature within its port districts
necessary for its purposes. Every port authority shall have the right and power to acquire the
same by purchase, negotiation, or by condemnation, and should it elect to exercise the right of
eminent domain, condemnation proceedings shall be maintained by and in the name of the
port authority, and it may proceed in the manner provided by the laws of this state for any
county or municipality. The power of eminent domain shall not apply to property actively
being used in relation to or in conjunction with river trade or commerce, unless such use is by
a port authority pursuant to a lease in which event the power of eminent domain shall apply;
(18) Contract and be contracted with, and to sue and be sued;
(19) Accept gifts, grants, loans or contributions from the United States of America,
the state of Missouri, political subdivisions, municipalities, foundations, other public or
private agencies, [individual, partnership] individuals, partnerships, or corporations;
(20) Employ such managerial, engineering, legal, technical, clerical, accounting,
advertising, stenographic, and other assistance as it may deem advisable. The port authority
may also contract with independent contractors for any of the foregoing assistance;
(21) Improve navigable and nonnavigable areas as regulated by federal statute;
(22) Disburse funds for its lawful activities and fix salaries and wages of its
employees; [and]

HCS HB 2693 5
(23) Adopt, alter or repeal its own bylaws, rules and regulations governing the
manner in which its business may be transacted; however, said bylaws, rules and regulations
shall not exceed the powers granted to the port authority by this chapter;
(24) Contract with any other port authority for the purpose of providing
administrative support and exercising, on such other port authority's behalf and in such
other port authority's name, the powers delegated to port authorities by this chapter;
and
(25) Establish port rangers as follows:
(a) A port authority may appoint and commission such port rangers as the port
authority deems advisable to assist the municipal police force in maintaining order and
preserving the peace within the boundaries of any real property owned or leased by the
port authority within the state and on public streets within the boundaries of or abutting
any real property owned or leased by the port authority within the state;
(b) Such port rangers shall have satisfactorily completed a training course as
prescribed by chapter 590 for peace officers within the state or shall otherwise comply
with the requirements of chapter 590 for certification within the time periods specified
in such chapter; and
(c) Each port ranger shall take and subscribe an oath of office to perform the
duties of such office faithfully and impartially and shall be given a certificate of
commission as a port ranger granting such port ranger the power to carry a firearm,
maintain order, preserve the peace, issue citations, and make arrests for violations of
state statutes and municipal ordinances within the port ranger's jurisdiction. The
municipal police force shall at all times maintain primary jurisdiction and no provision
of this subdivision shall be construed as depriving, curtailing, restricting, or otherwise
impairing such municipal police force in the performance of such police force's duties.
2. In implementing its powers, the port authority shall have the power to enter into
agreements with private operators or public entities for the joint development, redevelopment,
and reclamation of property within a port district or for other uses to fulfill the purposes of the
port authority.
68.040. 1. Every local and regional port authority, approved as a political subdivision
of the state, may from time to time issue its negotiable revenue bonds or notes in such
principal amounts as, in its opinion, shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for
achieving its purposes, including the construction of port facilities and the financing of port
improvement projects; establish reserves to secure such bonds and notes; and make other
expenditures, incident and necessary to carry out its purposes and powers.
2. (1) This state shall not be liable on any notes or bonds of any port authority.

HCS HB 2693 6
(2) Any such notes or bonds shall not be a debt of the state and shall contain on the
faces thereof a statement to such effect.
(3) The failure to include such statement on the faces of such notes or bonds shall
neither invalidate the notes or bonds nor render the state liable on such notes or bonds.
3. No commissioner of any port authority or any authorized person executing port
authority notes or bonds shall be liable personally on said notes or bonds or shall be subject to
any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.
4. The notes and bonds of every port authority are securities in which all public
officers and bodies of this state and all political subdivisions and municipalities, all insurance
companies and associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks,
trust companies, saving associations, savings and loan associations, credit unions, investment
companies, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all
other persons whatsoever, who now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in notes and
bonds or other obligations of this state, may properly and legally invest funds, including
capital, in their control or belonging to them.
5. No port authority shall be required to pay any taxes or any assessments whatsoever
to this state or to any political subdivisions, municipality, or other governmental agency of
this state. The notes and bonds of every port authority and the income therefrom shall, at all
times, be exempt from any taxes and any assessments, except for death and gift taxes and
taxes on transfers. Additionally, the leases of both real and personal property by or to any
port authority involving the issuance of bonds authorized under this chapter shall be exempt
from taxation. A port authority issuing bonds under this chapter for incentivized development
shall require the developer of any project which is to be leased to such developer, or any other
party, to confer with the affected taxing authorities, and subsequently contractually require the
payment of such sums as they may agree upon, or the port authority may elect to require such
sums to be allocated among such taxing authorities on the same pro rata basis as are ad
valorem property tax revenues.
6. Every port authority shall have the powers and be governed by the procedures now
or hereafter conferred upon or applicable to the environmental improvement authority,
chapter 260, relating to the manner of issuance of revenue bonds and notes, and the port
authority shall exercise all such powers and adhere to all such procedures insofar as they are
consistent with the necessary and proper undertaking of its purposes.
68.045. 1. Every local port authority shall be administered by a board of port
authority commissioners which shall consist of at least seven members; provided, however,
that the number of members of one political party shall not exceed the number of members of
the other party by more than one.

HCS HB 2693 7
2. Newly created port authorities as well as those presently constituted shall structure
the terms of those commissioners so that no more than three members' terms shall expire in
any one year. Each member shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed
as provided in this section.
3. In the event the county or city creating the port authority operates under a
charter form of government, the method of appointment and the qualifications, salaries,
powers, and duties of the appointees shall be as provided by such charter. In all other
cases, or if the charter is silent as to such matters, the legislative body or county
commission of the county or city creating the port authority or in the case of a port authority
created in this act in a constitutional charter city not within a county, the legislative body of
that constitutional charter city shall determine the method of appointment, and subject to the
limitations expressed in [the first sentence] subsection 1 of this section, shall determine their
qualifications, salaries, powers and duties consistent with the provisions of this chapter. If
the legislative body or county commission, as applicable, fails to determine such
qualifications, salaries, powers, and duties prior to appointment, the board of port
authority commissioners may elect to do so under the port authority's bylaws, consistent
with the provisions of this chapter.
4. A member of a board of port authority commissioners shall be removed from
office in such manner as is provided for the appointment of members as provided in
subsections 2 and 3 of this section for malfeasance, willful neglect of duty, or other cause
after notice and public hearing, unless such member expressly waives such notice or
hearing in writing. Removal for any other reason and the process to be undertaken in
effecting such removal shall be reserved to the board of port authority commissioners
and exercised as prescribed by the bylaws.
5. The legislative body or county commission shall also provide for the filing of
annual reports by the board of port authority commissioners and for periodic independent
audits of the accounts of the port authority.
68.055. 1. Every port authority shall let contracts for all work to be done and for
equipment, supplies or materials to be purchased. Excepting as otherwise provided herein,
such contracts shall be given to the [lowest responsible bidder therefor, upon not less than
twenty days' notice of the letting, given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation
in the city or county creating the port authority; and in the discretion of the commissioners, in
one or more newspapers of general circulation among contractors. The port authority shall
have the power and authority to reject any and all bids and to readvertise the work or
proposed purchase] bidder or proposer whose bid or proposal, when evaluated alongside
factors such as ability to perform, timeliness, character and reputation, quality of past
performance, compliance with applicable laws, quality and availability, and ability to

HCS HB 2693 8
provide future maintenance and services where applicable, is determined to be lowest
and best.
(1) Every port authority shall be authorized to use such additional procurement
methods authorized by any provision of state law with respect to political subdivisions
or not otherwise precluded by any provision of state law with respect to political
subdivisions, provided such nonprecluded methods are structured and implemented in a
manner as to ensure an open, transparent, competitive, and fair process.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection to the
contrary, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a port authority to use
anything other than a qualifications-based procurement method with respect to
professional architecture or engineering services in connection with the design,
construction, alteration, addition, remodel, or improvement of any public facility.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, every port authority
may let contracts in a manner consistent with the procedures set forth in 24 CFR Section
85.36, "Uniform Administrative Requirements for Grants and Cooperative Agreements to
State and Local Government", as may be revised from time to time, regardless of the source
of funds for the procurement, except that if a funding source mandates specific procedures for
letting contracts as a condition to receipt of funds which are inconsistent with the procedures
authorized in this section for letting contracts, a port authority may use such procedures
required by the funding source.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, the dollar limit of
procurements which may, pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, be accomplished using
"small purchase procedures", shall, for the purposes of procurements to be paid for with funds
other than federal funds, adjust annually based on the rate of inflation according to the
Consumer Price Index, commencing in 1995.
68.057. 1. Any expenditure made by a port authority[, as defined in section 68.205,]
that is over [twenty-five] seventy-five thousand dollars, including professional service
contracts, shall be competitively [bid] procured. Contracts shall be awarded upon not less
than twenty days' notice of the letting, given by publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or county creating the port authority and, in the discretion of the
commissioners, in one or more newspapers of general circulation among contractors. In
the event no newspaper of general circulation exists in the city or county creating the
port authority, the notice required in this subsection shall be given by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in an adjoining city or county or in such city or county
having a newspaper of general circulation as is geographically closest to the port
authority.

HCS HB 2693 9
2. The port authority shall have the power and authority to reject any and all
bids or proposals and to readvertise the work or proposed purchase.
68.060. 1. Any combination of cities and counties that do not have local port
authorities approved by the highways and transportation commission of the state of
Missouri as of the effective date of this act but that are individually eligible to form local
port authorities, and cities and counties with existing local port authorities, are authorized to
directly apply to the highways and transportation commission of the state for approval of a
regional port authority as a political subdivision of the state.
2. The legislative bodies or county commissions of cities or counties [desiring to form
a regional port authority], or such other persons as may be designated by charter for those
cities or counties operating under a charter form of government, as applicable, in
consultation with the boards of any existing local port authorities to be included within
the regional port authority, are hereby authorized to enter into contractual agreements with
each other for the purpose of creating within each jurisdiction regional port districts
administered by the regional port authority. All terms and provisions of said contractual
agreements shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The contractual agreement
shall be filed in the office of county clerk, city clerk or clerk of the county council of each
party to the agreement.
3. The boundaries of any regional port district, and the number, method of
appointment, terms, qualifications, salaries, powers and duties of a regional board of
commissioners shall be fixed by the contractual agreement; provided, however, that any
contractual agreement shall not become effective until it has been submitted to and approved
by all of the legislative bodies or county commissions entering into said contractual
agreement, or such other persons as may be designated by charter for those cities or
counties operating under a charter form of government, as applicable.
4. The port districts to be included within the regional port authority need not be
contiguous, adjacent, or abutting.
5. Any local port authority is authorized to contract with an existing regional port
authority for inclusion in the regional port authority. The contractual agreement shall be
formulated by the terms and procedures expressed in subsections 2 and 3 of this section.
Approval of the highways and transportation commission shall be required to make the
annexation effective.
6. Any local port authority established by a city or county, that subsequently enters
into a contractual agreement and is approved as part of a regional port authority, is dissolved
as of the date that the annexation is approved by the highways and transportation commission
of the state. On said date, all funds and other assets of the local port authority shall be

HCS HB 2693 10
transferred to the regional port authority. The regional port authority shall faithfully perform
all existing contracts and assume all legal obligations of the local port authority.
68.075. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Advanced Industrial
Manufacturing Zones Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "AIM zone", an area identified through a resolution passed by the port authority
board of commissioners appointed under section 68.045 that is being developed or
redeveloped for any purpose so long as any infrastructure and building built or improved is in
the development area. The port authority board of commissioners shall file an annual report
indicating the established AIM zones with the department of revenue;
(2) "County average wage", the average wage in each county as determined by the
Missouri department of economic development for the most recently completed full calendar
year. However, if the computed county average wage is above the statewide average wage,
the statewide average wage shall be deemed the county average wage for such county for the
purpose of determining eligibility;
(3) "New job", the number of full-time employees located at the project facility that
exceeds the project facility base employment less any decrease in the number of full-time
employees at related facilities below the related facility base employment. No job that was
created prior to the date of the notice of intent shall be deemed a new job, except that any
job determined by the Missouri department of economic development to be eligible for
and that is approved by the Missouri department of economic development for retention
of withholding tax under the Missouri works program established in sections 620.2000
to 620.2020 shall be deemed a new job for purposes of this section, provided that the
period of benefits under this section immediately follows the end of the period of
benefits under the Missouri works program. An employee that spends less than fifty
percent of the employee's work time at the facility is still considered to be located at a facility
if the employee receives his or her directions and control from that facility, is on the facility's
payroll, one hundred percent of the employee's income from such employment is Missouri
income, and the employee is paid at or above the county average wage;
(4) "Related facility", a facility operated by a company or a related company prior to
the establishment of the AIM zone in question located within any port district, as defined
under section 68.015, which is directly related to the operations of the facility within the new
AIM zone.
3. Any port authority located in this state may establish an AIM zone. Such zone may
only include the area within the port authority's jurisdiction, ownership, or control, and may
include any such area. The port authority shall determine the boundaries for each AIM zone,
and more than one AIM zone may exist within the port authority's jurisdiction or under the

HCS HB 2693 11
port authority's ownership or control, and may be expanded or contracted by resolution of the
port authority board of commissioners.
4. Fifty percent of the state tax withholdings imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265
on new jobs within such zone after development or redevelopment has commenced shall not
be remitted to the general revenue fund of the state of Missouri. Such moneys shall be
deposited into the port authority AIM zone fund established under subsection 5 of this section
for the purpose of continuing to expand, develop, and redevelop AIM zones identified by the
port authority board of commissioners and may be used for managerial, engineering, legal,
research, promotion, planning, satisfaction of bonds issued under section 68.040, and any
other expenses.
5. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Port Authority AIM Zone Fund",
which shall consist of money collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund and shall approve disbursements from the fund in accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180 to the port authorities from which the funds were collected, less
the pro-rata portion appropriated by the general assembly to be used solely for the
administration of this section which shall not exceed ten percent of the total amount collected
within the zones of a port authority. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the
credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the
same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
6. The port authority shall approve any projects that begin construction and disperse
any money collected under this section. The port authority shall submit an annual budget for
the funds to the department of economic development explaining how and when such money
will be spent.
7. The provision of section 23.253 notwithstanding, no AIM zone may be established
after August 28, 2030. Any AIM zone created prior to that date shall continue to exist and be
coterminous with the retirement of all debts incurred under subsection 4 of this section. No
debts may be incurred or reauthorized using AIM zone revenue after August 28, 2030.
68.085. 1. Records and documents submitted to a local or regional port
authority and pertaining to a business prospect that the port authority is currently
negotiating may be deemed a closed record as such term is defined in section 610.010.
2. Records and documents deemed a closed record under section 620.014 and
that are disclosed, in whole or in part, to a local or regional port authority evaluating the
provision of assistance under this chapter shall not lose their status as closed records by
virtue of such disclosure.

HCS HB 2693 12
68.205. As used in sections 68.200 to 68.260, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Act", the port improvement district act, sections 68.200 to 68.260;
(2) "Approval", for purposes of elections pursuant to this act, a simple majority of
those qualified voters casting votes in any election;
(3) "Board", the board of port authority commissioners for the particular port
authority that desires to establish or has established a district;
(4) "Consent", the written acknowledgment and approval of the creation of the district
by:
(a) Owners of real property collectively owning more than [sixty] fifty percent by
assessed value of real property within the boundaries of the proposed port improvement
district; and
(b) More than [sixty] fifty percent per capita of the owners of all real property within
the boundaries of the proposed port improvement district;
(5) "Director of revenue", the director of the department of revenue of the state of
Missouri;
(6) "Disposal of solid waste or sewage", the entire process of storage, collection,
transportation, processing, and disposal of solid wastes or sewage;
(7) "District" or "port improvement district", an area designated by the port authority
which is located within its port district boundaries at the time of establishment;
(8) "Election authority", the election authority having jurisdiction over the area in
which the boundaries of the district are located under chapter 115;
(9) "Energy conservation", the reduction of energy consumption;
(10) "Energy efficiency", the increased productivity or effectiveness of the use of
energy resources, the reduction of energy consumption, or the use of renewable energy
sources;
(11) "Obligations", revenue bonds and notes issued for the repayment of any money
obtained by a port authority from any public or private source along with any associated
financing costs, including, but not limited to, the costs of issuance, capitalized interest, and
debt service;
(12) "Owner", the individual or individuals or entity or entities who own a fee interest
in real property that is located within the boundaries of a district based upon the recorded real
estate records of the county recorder, or the city recorder of deeds if the district is located in a
city not within a county, as of the thirtieth day prior to any action;
(13) "Petition", a petition to establish a port improvement district within the port
district boundaries or a petition to make a substantial change to an existing district;

HCS HB 2693 13
(14) "Pollution", the existence of any noxious substance in the air or waters or on the
lands of the state in sufficient quantity and of such amounts, characteristics, and duration as to
injure or harm the public health or welfare or animal life or property;
(15) "Port authority", a political subdivision established pursuant to this chapter;
(16) "Port district boundaries", the boundaries of any port authority on file with the
clerk of the county commission, city clerk, or clerk of the legislative or governing body of the
county as applicable, which became effective upon approval by the Missouri highways and
transportation commission;
(17) "Project" or "port improvement project", with respect to any property within a
port improvement district, or benefitting property within a port improvement district:
(a) Providing for, or contracting for the provision of, environmental cleanup,
including the disposal of solid waste, services to brownfields, or other polluted real property;
(b) Providing for, or contracting for the provision of, energy conservation or
increased energy efficiency within any building, structure, or facility;
(c) Providing for, or contracting for the provision of, wetland creation, preservation,
or relocation;
(d) The construction of any building, structure, infrastructure, fixture, or facility
determined by the port authority as essential in developing energy resources, preventing,
reducing, or eliminating pollution, or providing water facilities or the disposal of solid waste;
(e) Modifications to, or the relocation of, any existing building, structure,
infrastructure, fixture, or facility that has been acquired or constructed, or which is to be
acquired or constructed for the purpose of developing energy resources, preventing, reducing,
or eliminating pollution, or providing water facilities or the disposal of solid waste;
(f) The acquisition, clearing, and grading of real property and the acquisition of other
property and improvements, or rights and interest therein, which are determined by the port
authority to be significant in, or in the furtherance of, the history, architecture, archeology, or
culture of the United States, the state of Missouri, or its political subdivisions;
(g) The operation, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation, or reconstruction of any
existing public or private building, structure, infrastructure, fixture, or facility determined by
the port authority to be significant in, or in the furtherance of, the history, architecture,
archeology, or culture of the United States, the state of Missouri, or its political subdivisions;
(h) The construction of any new building, structure, infrastructure, fixture, or facility
that is determined by the port authority to be significant in, or in the furtherance of, the
history, architecture, archeology, or culture of the United States, the state of Missouri, or its
political subdivisions;
(i) Providing for any project determined to be significant in or in furtherance of the
purpose of a port authority as provided in section 68.020;

HCS HB 2693 14
(18) "Qualified project costs", include any and all reasonable costs incurred or
estimated to be incurred by a port authority, or a person or entity authorized by a port
authority, in furtherance of a port improvement project, which costs may include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Costs of studies, plans, surveys, and specifications;
(b) Professional service costs, including, but not limited to, architectural, engineering,
legal, research, marketing, financial, planning, consulting, and special services, including
professional service costs necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability
of any project and carrying out the same;
(c) Administrative fees and costs of a port authority in carrying out any of the
purposes of this act;
(d) Property assembly costs, including, but not limited to, acquisition of land and
other property and improvements, real or personal, or rights or interests therein, demolition of
buildings and structures, and the clearing or grading of land, machinery, and equipment
relating to any project, including the cost of demolishing or removing any existing structures;
(e) Costs of operating, rehabilitating, reconstructing, maintaining, and repairing
existing buildings, structures, infrastructure, facilities, or fixtures;
(f) Costs of constructing new buildings, structures, infrastructure, facilities, or
fixtures;
(g) Costs of constructing, operating, rehabilitating, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing or removing public works or improvements;
(h) Financing costs, including, but not limited to, all necessary and incidental
expenses related to the port authority's issuance of obligations, which may include capitalized
interest on any such obligations and reasonable reserves related to any such obligations;
(i) All or a portion of the port authority's capital costs resulting from a port
improvement project necessarily incurred or to be incurred in furtherance of a port
100 improvement project, to the extent the port authority accepts and approves such costs; and
101 (j) Relocation costs, to the extent that a port authority determines that relocation costs
102 shall be paid, or are required to be paid, by federal or state law;
103 (19) "Qualified voters", for the purposes of an election for the approval of a real
104 property tax or a sales and use tax:
105 (a) Registered voters residing within the district; or
106 (b) If no registered voters reside within the district, the owners of one or more parcels
107 of real property within the district which would be subject to such real property taxes or sales
108 and use taxes, as applicable, based upon the recorded real estate records of the county
109 recorder, or the city recorder of deeds if the district is located in a city not within a county, as
110 of the thirtieth day prior to the date of the applicable election;

HCS HB 2693 15
111 (20) "Registered voters", persons who reside within the district and who are qualified
112 and registered to vote pursuant to chapter 115 as determined by the election authority as of the
113 thirtieth day prior to the date of the applicable election;
114 (21) "Respondent", unless the port authority is the owner of all real property within
115 the proposed district, the municipality or municipalities within which the proposed district is
116 located, the county or counties within which the proposed district is located, the Missouri
117 highways and transportation commission when the proposed district shall be within the
118 highways of the state of Missouri, and any other political subdivision within the boundaries of
119 the proposed port improvement district, except the petitioning port authority;
120 (22) "Revenues", all rents, revenues from any levied real property tax and sales and
121 use tax, charges and other income received by a port authority in connection with any project,
122 including any gift, grant, loan, or appropriation received by the port authority with respect
123 thereto;
124 (23) "Substantial changes", with respect to an established port improvement district,
125 the addition or removal of real property to or from the port improvement district and any
126 changes to the approved district funding mechanism; [and]
127 (24) "Taxpayer", a person or owner of real property within the proposed district who
128 would pay any real estate or use tax as a result of the district establishment; and
129 (25) "Water facilities", any facilities for the furnishing and treatment of water for
130 industrial, commercial, agricultural, or community purposes including, but not limited to,
131 wells, reservoirs, dams, pumping stations, water lines, sewer lines, treatment plants,
132 stabilization ponds, storm sewers, storm water detention and retention facilities, and related
133 equipment and machinery.
68.253. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 68.200 to 68.260 to the
contrary, if the port authority is the owner of all the real property within the proposed
district or existing district for which a substantial change has been proposed or one
hundred percent per capita of the owners of all the real property within the proposed
district or existing district for which a substantial change has been proposed have
consented in writing to the creation of the proposed district or substantial change,
consideration of the petition by the circuit court shall not be required. In such event,
certification of any question with respect to any tax proposed to be levied or modified
shall be made by the board of port authority commissioners and thereafter provided to
the election authority as otherwise provided by section 68.250.
[68.259. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140 to the
contrary, the provisions of sections 68.025, 68.035, 68.040, 68.057, 68.070,
68.200, 68.205, 68.210, 68.215, 68.220, 68.225, 68.230, 68.235, 68.240,
68.245, 68.250, 68.255, and 68.260 as contained in this act shall be severable,

HCS HB 2693 16
and if any provision is for any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall not
invalidate any of the remaining provisions of sections 68.025, 68.035, 68.040,
68.057, 68.070, 68.200, 68.205, 68.210, 68.215, 68.220, 68.225, 68.230,
68.235, 68.240, 68.245, 68.250, 68.255, and 68.260 as contained in this act.]
✔